Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1117
Election contests; appeal; when allowed; bond.

Except for election contests involving a member of the Legislature, an appeal from a final determination in an election contest may be taken in the same time or manner and to the same courts as is provided by law with respect to appeals in civil cases. In case of appeal, a bond with sufficient sureties shall be given conditioned for the payment of the costs accrued and to accrue in the cause. A new bond shall be given when required by any court in which the cause may be pending.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 360.